District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-4062

Retaliatory action

Repealed.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 905, 32 DCR 3089

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 45-1561 to 45-1563.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of subchapter: Section 905 of D.C. Act 6-10, effective July 17, 1985, provided that the provisions of subchapter V are repealed.